Missouri, session 2026, HB11.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
PART 1
Section 11.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item
or items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part
1. Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 2
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of
this act shall consist of guidance to the Department of Social
Services in implementing the appropriations found in Part 1 and
Part 2 of this act. An appropriation may be comprised in whole
or in part of a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall
be construed to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the
stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation
identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an
addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal
periods beyond June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-time
may, however, be requested in any future fiscal period as a new
decision item.
Section 11.005. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Director’s Office, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.905
Personal Service ................................................................................................$154,437
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................6,362
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 33,676
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................194,475
Personal Service ..................................................................................................183,905
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................2,740
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,197
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................187,842
Personal Service ....................................................................................................43,323
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................... 685
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 44,008
Total (Not to exceed 2.93 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$426,325

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 3
Section 11.010. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Director’s Office, Children’s Division Residential Program Unit
For administrative expenses
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,399,932
Expense and Equipment (including $4,413 one-time) ............................. 162,625
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,562,557
Personal Service ..................................................................................................573,659
Expense and Equipment (including $4,414 one-time) ............................. 27,003
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 600,662
Total (Not to exceed 33.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,163,219
Section 11.015. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General Assembly
provided that the General Assembly shall be notified of the
source of any new funds and the purpose for which they shall be
expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$2,000,000
From Family Services Donations Fund (1167) .................................................... 33,999
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,033,999
Section 11.020. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the OA
Information Technology Federal Fund
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$21,141,931
Section 11.022. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For implementation on the citizen engagement platform of a Medicaid
application providing transparency and two-way communication
for efficient application processing and data collection as well as
additional functionality necessary to improve efficiency in
processing applications for assistance, provided the department
shall procure services in compliance with Chapter 34 RSMo.
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$4,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 4
Section 11.025. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Human Resources Center, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
Personal Service ................................................................................................$377,106
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,068
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................388,174
Personal Service ..................................................................................................235,005
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 29,850
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................264,855
Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 28,577
Total (Not to exceed 10.50 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................$681,606
Section 11.030. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the State Technical Assistance Team (STAT)
For the prevention and investigation of child abuse, child neglect, child
sexual abuse, child exploitation/pornography or child fatality
cases, as described in Sections 660.520 to 660.528, RSMo, and
for administrative expenses, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment; and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.905
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,071,660
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 224,036
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 33.50 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,295,696
Section 11.035. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit, provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,976,621
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 400,061
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,376,682

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 5
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,469,950
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 900,498
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................3,370,448
Personal Service ....................................................................................................14,157
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,095
From FMAP Enhancement – Expansion Fund (2466) .....................................................18,252
Expense and Equipment
From Recovery Audit and Compliance Fund (1974) .......................................................82,087
Personal Service ..................................................................................................342,361
Expense and Equipment (including $1,298,549 one-time) ...................... 1,440,495
From Medicaid Provider Enrollment Fund (1990) .............................................. 1,782,856
Total (Not to exceed 90.05 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$7,630,325
Section 11.040. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit
For a case management, provider enrollment, and fraud abuse and
detection system, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.905
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,141,709
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 5,858,291
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,000,000
Section 11.045. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit
For the design, development, implementation, maintenance, and
operation costs for a Medicaid provider enrollment system
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$623,806
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (one-time) ............... 17,301,192
Total .........................................................................................................................$17,924,998
Section 11.050. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 6
For recovery audit services
Expense and Equipment
From Recovery Audit and Compliance Fund (1974) ................................................$1,200,000
Section 11.055. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,251,869
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 382,549
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,634,418
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,310,944
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 251,278
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,562,222
Personal Service ......................................................................................................5,246
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 317
From Department of Social Services Administrative Trust Fund (1545) ...........................5,563
Personal Service ....................................................................................................65,736
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 750
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................................66,486
For the centralized inventory system, for reimbursable goods and
services provided by the department, and for related equipment
replacement and maintenance expenses
From Department of Social Services Administrative Trust Fund (1545) ............ 1,200,000
Total (Not to exceed 50.52 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$5,468,689
Section 11.060. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the Child Welfare Eligibility Unit
For administrative expenses, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$881,572
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,300
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................902,872
Personal Service ..................................................................................................779,815

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 7
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 18,964
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 798,779
Total (Not to exceed 35.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,701,651
Section 11.065. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the Compliance Services Unit
For administrative expenses
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$212,461
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................136,746
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................255,985
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146) ..........................................................178,134
For contracted compliance monitoring and fiscal monitoring services
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,031,110
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 578,663
Total (Not to exceed 11.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,393,099
Section 11.070. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the payment of fees to contractors who engage in revenue
maximization projects on behalf of the Department of Social
Services and the General Assembly
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..........................................$750,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,000,000
Section 11.075. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the receipt and disbursement of refunds and incorrectly deposited
receipts to allow the over-collection of accounts receivables to be
paid back to the recipient, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between federal and other funds within this section
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) .............................................$450,000
From FMAP Enhancement – Expansion Fund (2466) ...................................................450,000
From Federal and Other Fund (1189) ..........................................................................1,500,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................5,025,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 8
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ...........................27,000
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ......................................................................10,250,000
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ......................................................369,000
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146). .........................................................300,000
From Title XXI - Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal
Fund (1159) ......................................................................................................1,500,000
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114) ..............................................................................25,000
From Premium Fund (1885) ................................................................................ 5,500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$25,396,000
Section 11.080. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For payments to counties and the City of St. Louis toward the care and
maintenance of each delinquent or dependent child as provided
in Section 211.156, RSMo, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,171,980
Section 11.085. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Legal Services administrative expenses, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 11.905
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,716,843
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 132,924
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,849,767
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,410,360
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 171,885
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,582,245
Personal Service ..................................................................................................749,526
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 230,773
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................980,299
Personal Service ..................................................................................................719,349
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 91,158
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ......................................................810,507
Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 178,880

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 9
Total (Not to exceed 107.42 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$7,401,698
Section 11.090. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Legal Services
For permanency attorneys and permanency attorney contracted services,
including reunification, guardianship, adoption, or termination of
parental rights, for children in the care, custody, or involved with
the Children’s Division, provided twenty five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from expense and equipment to personal
service, and further provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is
allowed from personal service to expense and equipment, and
further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420, 11.425, 11.440, 11.465, 11.475,
and 11.480
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,599,951
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,386,211
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,986,162
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,802,820
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,415,506
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................3,218,326
Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................252,379
Personal Service
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ........................................................67,045
Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................................14,061
For Title IV-E reimbursements to counties, the City of St. Louis, and
other organizations who receive public dollars for the legal
representation of parents and children in juvenile or family courts
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................600,000
For non-recurring adoption or legal guardianship expenses related to
permanency, including but not limited to: reasonable and
necessary adoption fees, court costs, attorney fees and other

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 10
expenses which are directly related to the legal adoption or legal
guardianship
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,019,345
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................826,778
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................408,177
For a program to provide legal representation for parents of children who
are the subject of child abuse and neglect investigations under
Chapter 210 and potential court proceedings under Chapter 211
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 150,000
Total (Not to exceed 69.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$13,542,273
Section 11.091. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Legal Services
For a not-for-profit organization to provide legal assistance for kinship
placements with non-contested guardianship cases in a county
with more than seven hundred thousand but fewer than eight
hundred thousand inhabitants, and a county with more than two
hundred thirty thousand but fewer than two hundred sixty
thousand inhabitants, and a county with more than one hundred
thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
than six thousand inhabitants, and a county with more than one
hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand
inhabitants, and with a county seat with more than nine thousand
but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants, and in a county with
more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than nine
thousand but fewer than twelve thousand five hundred
inhabitants, and in a county with more than one hundred fifty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, and
in a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than ten
thousand but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants, and in a
county with more than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty
thousand inhabitants, and in a county with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three thousand
but fewer than four thousand five hundred fifty inhabitants, to

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 11
help children remain safely with kinship caregivers and prevent
the need for foster care placement
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
Section 11.100. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,214,769
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 24,929
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,239,698
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,844,901
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,570,815
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................9,415,716
Personal Service ....................................................................................................51,137
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 501,513
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................552,650
Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 657,029
Total (Not to exceed 109.80 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$12,865,093
Section 11.105. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the income maintenance field staff and operations, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$27,779,843
Expense and Equipment (including $1,000,000 one-time) ...................... 3,917,852
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................31,697,695
Personal Service .............................................................................................44,632,651
Expense and Equipment (including $3,622,121 one-time) ...................... 18,583,707
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................63,216,358
Personal Service ..................................................................................................816,197
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,879,836
From FMAP Enhancement – Expansion Fund (2466) ................................................4,696,033

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 12
Personal Service ..................................................................................................434,233
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 95,138
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................529,371
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,037,345
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,924
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 1,065,269
Total (Not to exceed 1,602.23 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$101,204,726
Section 11.110. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Income Maintenance (IM) Call Center
For state operated and contracted call center administrative and
operational expenses, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between subsections within this section
For Medicaid and Children’s Health Insurance Program (CHIP)
eligibility
Personal Service ................................................................................................$920,389
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,544,470
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,464,859
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,768,127
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,632,904
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................7,401,031
For Adult Expansion Group (AEG) eligibility, as described in Section
36(c) of Article IV of the Missouri Constitution
Personal Service ..................................................................................................315,567
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 540,473
From FMAP Enhancement - Expansion Fund (2466) ....................................................856,040
Personal Service ..................................................................................................965,469
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,621,418
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,586,887
For Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) eligibility
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,898,305
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,882,701
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................9,781,006

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 13
Personal Service ...............................................................................................6,367,424
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,881,515
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................10,248,939
For Temporary Assistance eligibility
Personal Service ..................................................................................................552,291
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 245,951
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 798,242
Total (Not to exceed 438.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$34,137,004
Section 11.115. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Income Maintenance (IM) Call Center
For the operation of the Interactive Voice Response (IVR) System
For Medicaid and Children’s Health Insurance Program (CHIP)
eligibility
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$176,710
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (one-time) ..........................323,290
For Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) eligibility
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................176,710
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (one-time) ............... 323,290
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,000,000
Section 11.120. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For public acute care hospital partnerships to assist with eligibility
determinations for Medicaid and CHIP
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 1,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,000,000
Section 11.125. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For income maintenance and child support staff training, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 14
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$105,069
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 110,723
Total ..............................................................................................................................$215,792
Section 11.126. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a statewide healthy food incentive program that matches
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP, or food
assistance) dollars spent at farmers markets, farm stands, mobile
markets and grocery stores in Missouri, to provide SNAP
recipients greater access to fresh vegetables and fruit
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
Section 11.127. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit organization established in 2018 to provide benefits and
services as provided by the Refugee Act of 1980 as amended;
whose mission and vision is promoting the well-being and
inclusion of refugees by resourcing and coordinating resettlement
programs across the state; and subcontracts or partners with local
refugee resettlement programs throughout the state to ensure
access to resources needed to help populations serviced rebuild
their lives
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$37,904,538
Section 11.130. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Electronic Benefit Transfers (EBT) system
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$835,130
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................834,797
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 100,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,769,927
Section 11.135. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) program
For administrative expenses
Personal Service ................................................................................................$171,367

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 15
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,543
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................182,910
Personal Service ..................................................................................................171,367
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,543
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 182,910
Total (Not to exceed 6.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$365,820
Section 11.140. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) program
For contracted vendor costs
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,413,100
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 6,413,100
Total .........................................................................................................................$12,826,200
Section 11.141. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Missouri SuN Bucks Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT)
program benefit disbursements
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$51,500,000
Section 11.142. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the costs of judgment and other expenses related to resolution of the
HHS Technology Group Holdings, LLC v. State of Missouri,
Case No. WD86036
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$48,781,865
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (one-time) ............... 43,903,679
Total .........................................................................................................................$92,685,544
Section 11.145. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the receipt of funds from the Polk County and Bolivar Charitable
Trust for the exclusive benefit and use of the Polk County Office
From Family Services Donations Fund (1167) ...............................................................$10,000
Section 11.150. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 16
For contractor, hardware, and other costs associated with planning,
development, and implementation of a Family Assistance
Management Information System (FAMIS), provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$571,908
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..............................................73,422
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 400,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,045,330
Section 11.155. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Missouri Eligibility Determination and Enrollment System
(MEDES), provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 11.155 and 11.160, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
For the design, development, implementation, maintenance and
operation costs of the Medicaid and Children’s Health Insurance
Program (CHIP) eligibility categories under the Modified
Adjusted Gross Income (MAGI) based methodology
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative
costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,679,105
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................25,179,260
From FMAP Enhancement - Expansion Fund (2466) ....................................................500,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,300,007
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................1,000,004
For the design, development, and implementation costs for Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP)
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,688,120
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................11,058,108
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................2,000,000
For the design, development, and implementation costs for Temporary
Assistance (TA)

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 17
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative costs
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................200,000
For the expenses for the independent verification and validation (IV&V)
services
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................352,983
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................970,537
For the expenses related to the enterprise content management (ECM)
system
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $577,416 one-time) .........................1,031,283
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (including
$890,587 one-time) ..........................................................................................3,118,087
For the expenses related to the project management office (PMO)
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,359,631
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 2,661,566
Total .........................................................................................................................$55,098,691
Section 11.160. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For third party eligibility verification services: in order to improve the
accuracy of Medicaid, SNAP and TANF eligibility
determinations and redeterminations, increase operational
efficiencies, achieve cost savings, and minimize fraud, the
Missouri Department of Social Services shall obtain real-time
employment and income data (up-to-date, non-modeled
employment and income data provided by employers and/or
payroll providers) from a payroll data provider, as defined by the
Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. s.1681 et seq., provided the
term "payroll data provider" means payroll providers, wage
verification companies, and other commercial or non-
commercial entities that collect and maintain data regarding
employment and wages; and further provided the contractors
shall also, on a monthly basis, identify participants of covered
programs who have died, moved out of state, or been incarcerated

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 18
longer than 90 days, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.155 and 11.160
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,197,481
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................9,946,513
From FMAP Enhancement – Expansion Fund (2466) ...................................................654,781
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 217,878
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,016,653
Section 11.165. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Food Nutrition Program
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$14,343,791
Section 11.166. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
provides a supportive and engaging environment for senior
citizens, offering a variety of activities designed to promote
cognitive health, social interaction, and overall well-being
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$100,000
Section 11.169. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit organization located in a city not within a county that
provides programs that address community needs listed in RSMO
Chapter 660.025, including but not limited to workforce
development, job placement, learning the English language, and
mental health services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,500,000
Section 11.170. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For Missouri Work Programs
For a century-old viable non-profit entity located in a city not within a
county that annually serves over one hundred thousand clients
regionally assisting participants to become successful employees

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 19
and that serves economically disadvantaged males and females to
find jobs and have the opportunity to earn livable wages
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................$1,000,000
For a non-profit, faith-based organization located in a city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county which solely focuses on young African American males,
ages 8 to 18 through four areas: socially, academically,
emotionally, and spiritually in preparing program participants for
employment, civic service, and high school completions and
higher education
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ............................................................................................................100,000
For a program in a city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants
and located in more than one county to teach parenting
curriculum and other skills to men, along with assisting them in
finding employment, health care, dealing with civil and criminal
charges and cases, and other social services thus allowing them
to develop healthy and supportive relationships with their kids
and families
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(including $150,000 one-time)............................................................................250,000
For the purpose of funding a program in a city not within a county to
foster healthy relationships by strengthening families and
reducing the rates of absentee fathers through employment
placement, job readiness, and employer retention skills
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 2,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,350,000
Section 11.171. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county that provides training in the trade of pet grooming to break
through generational poverty
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$300,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 20
Section 11.172. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit agency located in any county with more than seventy
thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants dedicated to
providing comprehensive education and therapy services to
children with developmental disabilities and delays such as
cerebral palsy, down syndrome, autism spectrum disorders,
traumatic brain injury, seizure disorders, and multiple rare
genetic disorders
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,500,000
Section 11.175. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization located in any county with more than one
million inhabitants that provides youth and their family with
mentorship as well as virtual or in-person educational
opportunities relating to college preparedness, workforce
development, and character preparation to foster academic
success
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................$1,176,069
Section 11.176. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit organization whose mission is to provide children and
adults with care and support located in a county with more than
one million inhabitants for habilitation, autism services, early
childhood development, and family services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$500,000
Section 11.179. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For an organization whose mission is to improve the quality of life in our
communities and enhance educational and economic
opportunities for all in a city not within a county to implement an
innovative program designed to support at-risk youth, young
adults and returning citizens who are either part of a diversion
program, transitioning back into society from incarceration, or
navigating out of the school system aiming to provide a holistic

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 21
suite of services that include mentorship, skill development, and
community reintegration support
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$660,000
Section 11.180. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a public school located in a city with more than one thousand nine
hundred but fewer than two thousand one hundred fifty
inhabitants and located in a county with more than twenty-two
thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than five hundred but fewer than
nine hundred, a public school located in a city with more than
twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifty thousand
but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than twelve thousand six hundred but fewer than
fifteen thousand inhabitants, a public school located in a city with
more than seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than
fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen
thousand six hundred inhabitants, a public school located in a city
with more than four thousand nine hundred but fewer than five
thousand six hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a
county with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer
than fourteen thousand inhabitants, and a public school located in
a city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer
than fourteen thousand inhabitants and located in a county with
more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than ten thousand
but fewer than twelve thousand six hundred inhabitants, for a
model that uses integrated student support in collaboration with
local communities to address barriers to student success
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................$1,200,000
For an organization with a program with the goal of reaching
independence from poverty through support, education, career
development, financial planning, and mentoring located in a city
with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two
hundred thousand inhabitants

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 22
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................950,000
For a nonprofit organization located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county that provides programs and services including math,
science, and computer tutoring; jobs skills training;
transportation; food and clothing programs; and sports programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For the purpose of funding a program in any city not within a county that
builds strong families and vibrant communities by providing
hope, comprehensive services, and meaningful opportunities that
exemplifies the cultural and artistic traditions of people in Africa,
the Caribbean and the Americas
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) .........................................................................................................1,000,000
For a nonprofit, little league baseball organization in a city with more
than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
one county to educate, inspire and empower young men to
become community leaders
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..............................................................................................................50,000
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city not within a county that
has been in operation for over 100 years and provides children
and family services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................2,000,000
For the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) benefits and
Temporary Assistance (TA) Diversion transitional benefits
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,856,800
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 16,200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$26,256,800
Section 11.181. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city not within a county and
was founded in 2015, provided that said organization provides

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 23
mentoring, family counseling, and tutoring services for young
men ranging in ages from 8 to 18 years old, and further provided
that funds shall be used for transportation needs, meeting space
rental, part-time mentoring coordinators, and healthy food
choices during weekend events
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$100,000
Section 11.182. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a Family Connection Center located in any city with more than fifty-
one thousand but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$375,000
For a Family Connection Center located in a city not within a county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................375,000
For a Family Connection Center located in a county with more than one
million inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................375,000
For a Family Connection Center located in a city with more than sixteen
thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and that is
the county seat of a county with more than twenty-five thousand
but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 375,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,500,000
Section 11.184. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a sports enrichment park in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county for
students that provides a supervised and structured environment
for empowering youth to develop self-esteem, basic life skills,
respect for the rights of others and property, all through: sport,
fitness, cultural, and educational programming
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$400,000
Section 11.185. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 24
For the Family Support Division
For a healthy marriage and fatherhood initiative
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................$1,250,000
For a not-for-profit organization which was founded in 2008 and located
in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five thousand but
fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants provided the
funds are used for responsible fatherhood services and healthy
marriage activities
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,750,000
Section 11.190. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For supplemental payments to aged or disabled persons
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$10,872
Section 11.195. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For nursing care payments to aged, blind, or disabled persons, and for
personal funds to recipients of Supplemental Nursing Care
payments as required by Section 208.030, RSMo, provided
thirty-five percent (35%) flexibility is allowed from Section
11.195 to 11.745
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$25,420,885
Section 11.200. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For Blind Pension and supplemental payments to blind persons, provided
that the Department of Social Services, whenever it calculates a
new estimated rate or rates for the Blind Pension and/or
supplemental payments to blind persons for the upcoming fiscal
year, shall transmit the new estimated rate or rates, as well as the
accompanying assumptions and calculations used to create the
new estimated rate or rates, to the following organizations:
Missouri Council for the Blind, National Federation of the Blind
of Missouri, and the State Rehabilitation Council
From Blind Pension Fund (1621) ............................................................................$43,780,576

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 25
Section 11.205. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the administration of blind services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,093,800
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 136,566
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,230,366
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,113,351
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 754,915
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 4,868,266
Total (Not to exceed 102.69 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$6,098,632
Section 11.206. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit organization, founded in 2009 and located in a county
with more than one million inhabitants that prepares
disadvantaged males to successfully complete high school
through demonstrating superior leadership skills, academic
excellence, community service, and career readiness in order to
successfully transition into higher education or trade
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$750,000
Section 11.210. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For services for the visually impaired, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,511,211
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................6,444,946
From Family Services Donations Fund (1167) .................................................................99,995
From Blindness Education, Screening and Treatment Program Fund
(1892) ....................................................................................................... 349,325
Total ...........................................................................................................................$8,405,487
Section 11.215. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For business enterprise programs for the blind
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$44,603,034
Section 11.220. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 26
For the Family Support Division
For Child Support Enforcement field staff and operations, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,681,668
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,587,989
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,269,657
Personal Service .............................................................................................19,803,965
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,770,516
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................27,574,481
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,457,642
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 396,390
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 2,854,032
Total (Not to exceed 584.04 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$36,698,170
Section 11.225. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Child Support Enforcement Call Center
For state operated call center administrative and operational expenses
Personal Service ................................................................................................$887,742
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 614,885
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,502,627
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,694,015
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,297,503
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,991,518
Personal Service ..................................................................................................129,519
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 95,844
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 225,363
Total (Not to exceed 67.20 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,719,508
Section 11.229. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization, founded in 1975 with a local chapter in
a city not within a county that is committed to expanding youth
understanding of engineering careers
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 27
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$250,000
Section 11.230. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For reimbursements to counties and the City of St. Louis and contractual
agreements with local governments providing child support
services, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,240,491
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................14,886,582
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 400,212
Total .........................................................................................................................$17,527,285
Section 11.231. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a business-led private, non-profit organization that is located in a
county with more than seven hundred thousand but fewer than
eight hundred thousand inhabitants that serves individuals within
the county and neighboring counties by providing individuals
with priority access to local employers, debt-free training to
qualified customers, supportive services, and ongoing assistance
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$500,000
Section 11.233. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For an alternative education program, located in any county with more
than one million inhabitants, for youth/young adults who have a
high school diploma or GED or are in need of obtaining either a
high school diploma or passing the high school equivalency
exam, or targeting out-of-school youth and other at-risk
populations ages 17-24, that focuses on leadership, development,
financial literacy, and academic enhancement, technical skills
training in construction, community service, and support from
staff and students committed to each other’s success
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$750,000
Section 11.235. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 28
For reimbursements to the federal government for federal Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families payments, refunds of bonds,
refunds of support payments or overpayments, and distributions
to families
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$36,500,000
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 6,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$42,500,000
Section 11.240. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Department of Social Services Federal Fund
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ........................................................................$955,000
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Child
Support Enforcement Fund
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 245,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,200,000
Section 11.245. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Office of Workforce and Community Initiatives
For administrative expenses
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$120,626
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,983,719
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 1,068,061
Total (Not to exceed 48.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,172,406
Section 11.246. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city with more than one
hundred five thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty-five
thousand inhabitants to partner with neighbors and collaborate on
strategies that foster community stability and individual
wellbeing
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 11.250. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 29
For grants and contracts to Community Partnerships and other
community initiatives and related expenses, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,632,328
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..............................................78,307
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................7,525,492
For the Missouri Mentoring Partnership
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................935,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................508,700
For a program for adolescents with the goal of preventing teen
pregnancies
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 600,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,279,827
Section 11.251. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the employee and program expenses for a nonprofit organization
located in a city not within a county to organize, advocate and
develop leadership capacity for the families of incarcerated and
formerly incarcerated individuals
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$500,000
Section 11.252. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a 501(c)(3) non-profit corporation formed in 2010, and located in a
city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than
two hundred thousand inhabitants to assist at-risk or foster care
youth ranging in ages from 16 to 24 years old through its positive
youth development programs and by helping them identify and
apply their unique strengths in order to experience a successful,
self-sufficient transition into adulthood
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$800,000
Section 11.253. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 30
For a 501 (c)(3) organization incorporated in 1971 located in a city with
more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more
than one county that offers residential support to men over 21
years old as they work to rebuild their lives from alcohol and drug
use
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 11.254. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit community organization in a city not within a county,
initiative focused on the adaptive reuse of a 100-year-old vacant
building in an underserved census tract, and the project will serve
as a diverse job creator, housing youth programs, startups, co-
working spaces, retail, and manufacturing under one roof and will
comply with CPACE (Clean Energy)
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 11.255. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Missouri Work Assistance Program Unit
For Work Assistance Programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,855,554
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................12,017,755
For the Missouri SkillUp Program
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................4,672,471
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................5,469,104
For the attendance of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
recipients at adult high schools as designated by the Department
of Elementary and Secondary Education
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................5,100,000
For the attendance of low-income individuals at adult high schools as
designated by the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,000,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................7,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 31
For the purpose of providing matching funds for a new adult high school
awarded by the state serving a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ......................................................................1,000,000
For child care at adult high school locations
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,010,000
For the Summer Jobs Program
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................850,000
For Jobs for America’s Graduates
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................4,500,000
For the Foster Care Jobs Program
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,000,000
For the purpose of funding a program located in a city not within a county
that assists individuals with limited opportunities to self-
sufficiency by breaking down barriers to self-sufficiency,
assisting survivors of domestic violence while fostering healthy
co-parenting relationships, reducing the rates of absentee fathers,
child development and strengthening families, all while creating
a safer and more inclusive community
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(including $1,000,000 one-time) ......................................................................2,000,000
For a program located in a city not within a county that fosters inclusion
of minority and women-owned businesses on construction
projects
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................500,000
For an organization located in a city not within a county, whose mission
is to empower individuals for social and economic growth
through relationship and opportunity by facilitating supplemental
education programs, job development and training, and
community service programs for under-resourced individuals
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 32
For an organization located in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
works to improve the quality of life for individuals in the Latino
communities of Greater Kansas City through education, financial
counseling and lending, and cultural events
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) .........................................................................................................5,000,000
For a comprehensive counseling and solution generation service that
focuses on a multi-year journey for high school students from
initial training to full-time employment with pre-identified entry
level jobs that drive the program’s training while earning a degree
relating to information technology, provided that the service is
designed to assist with environmental hurdles and with students
receiving accredited course credit from institutions for higher
education in the state of Missouri, and further provided that the
service includes a multi-year, wrap around support infrastructure
for each student that extends from the student’s acceptance into
the program through full time employment and continues until
the student completes a degree, if so requested by the program
participant, also known as HyperCare
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,750,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,750,000
For a nonprofit organization located in any county with more than four
hundred thousand but fewer than five hundred thousand
inhabitants whose mission is to provide school districts' students
personnel with suicide prevention skills and awareness, training
on social media harassment and bullying interventions, and
mental health therapy resources
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ................................................................................................. 350,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$60,824,884
Section 11.256. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For an organization founded in 1922 that provides and deploys
accountable funding and support for nonprofits statewide focused

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 33
on basic needs, financial stability, childhood development and
youth services, health and wellbeing, and education
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) .......................................................................................................$5,000,000
Section 11.257. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit program located in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
assists high school graduates, young adults, and career-seeking
individuals in obtaining post-secondary education and job
training and teaching the imperative career-skill and work ethic
necessary to become successful employees
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$500,000
Section 11.258. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For capital improvements at a nonprofit community center that promotes
youth development, healthy and active living, and community
responsibility located in a city with more than sixteen thousand
but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and that is the
county seat of a county with more than twenty-five thousand but
fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,300,000
Section 11.259. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization located in a city with more than one hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants
that provides financial and emotional support to families whose
children are battling pediatric emergencies
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$250,000
Section 11.260. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization located in county with more than one
million inhabitants and founded in 2018 who focuses on
underserved children and families provided the funds be used for

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 34
youth jobs programs, mentoring sessions, transportation costs
and healthy meals for summer youth events
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$500,000
Section 11.261. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a 501(c)(3) non-profit corporation with more than 50 employees,
formed in 1998, and located in a city with more than one hundred
and sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants for a school-based social work program that provides
enhanced support for children and family members suffering
trauma as a result of addiction in the family
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$1,000,000
Section 11.265. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For support to Food Banks’ effort to provide services and food to low-
income individuals
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ..................$10,000,000
For an evidence-based program through a school-based early warning
and response system that improves student attendance, behavior,
and course performance in reading and math by identifying the
root causes for student absenteeism, classroom disruption, and
course failure
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,500,000
For after school support programs
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,000,000
For out of school support programs
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................2,000,000
For services that provide assistance and engagement to address critical
areas of need for low-income individuals, families, and children
located in a city not within a county
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................250,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 35
For a program located in a city not within a county that helps youth,
families, and older adults attain self-sustaining lives by providing
innovative social, educational, and recreational resources
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................200,000
For a program located in a city not within a county that offers community
housing and community integration to adults with developmental
disabilities in nurturing, positive, and stable home-like
environments
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................230,000
For a century-old viable non-profit entity located in a city not within a
county that annually serves over one hundred thousand clients
regionally in efforts to deescalate violence and offer conflict
mediation and connects neighborhood residents with the
necessary viable resources and services, in an effort to reduce
crime, violence, and to improve the quality of life
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) (one-time) ....................................................1,500,000
For a nonprofit organization serving youth for over twenty years that
enables young people to reach their full potential as productive,
caring, responsible citizens by providing a club experience,
including after school and summer programs that assures success
located in any city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer
than eighteen thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of
a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,000,000
For a nonprofit organization founded in 2016 located in a city with more
than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
one county, that is providing access to fresh, affordable and
healthy foods to over 250,000 local residents experiencing food
insecurity
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................500,000
For a nonprofit organization located in a city not within a county that
helps junior and senior high teens to find security and direction
and increase graduation rates through relationship building with

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 36
a mentor through involvement beyond school hours or basic after
school programs
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................100,000
For a nonprofit organization that enables young people to reach their full
potential as productive, caring, responsible citizens by providing
a club experience that assures success that serves nearly eight
thousand local kids located in any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,480,000
Section 11.266. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city not within a county to
improve the quality of life of people affected by HIV, illness, and
poverty, and to advance their stability and well-being through
housing, health, and empowerment services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$250,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ................................................................................................. 250,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$500,000
Section 11.267. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a 501(c)(3) non-profit corporation with more than 30 employees,
formed in 1969, and located in a city with more than one hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants
for training, resources, and support to equip volunteers to tutor
and support student learning in public elementary schools
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$150,000
Section 11.269. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization located in any city with more than sixteen
thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and that is
the county seat of a county with more than forty thousand but
fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants that provides shelter and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 37
advocacy services for sexual assault or domestic violence victims
and their children
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$100,000
Section 11.270. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit located in a county with more than one million
inhabitants which focuses on at risk and under-represented youth
and young adults provided the funding is used for personal and
professional skills development, peer-mentoring services, and
training young adults to become mentor leaders
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$70,000
Section 11.275. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For out of school enrichment initiatives
Program Distribution
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................$7,265,000
Section 11.280. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a healthy marriage and fatherhood initiative delivered by a Missouri
nonprofit corporation at multiple locations throughout the state
of Missouri with a primary office located in a city with more than
one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(including $500,000 one-time).......................................................................$2,000,000
Section 11.285. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For alternatives to abortion services, including the provision of diapers
and other infant hygiene products to women who qualify for
alternative to abortion services, provided that if the Department
grants or allocates funds to certain not-for-profit organizations or
regions of the state that are unused or anticipated to be unused,
then the Department shall redistribute such funds to other not-for-
profit organizations or regions of the state to ensure that all the
funds appropriated are available to serve women who qualify for
alternatives to abortion services, and further provided that the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 38
Department shall not limit the amount that can be expended per
client
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,033,561
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..............................................50,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................10,300,000
For the alternatives to abortion public awareness program, including
assistance to contractors and subcontractors with the Department
for alternatives to abortion services, to help alternatives to
abortion agencies reach pregnant women at risk for having
abortions when such agencies are blocked or in any other way
suppressed by any search engine, social media platform, or digital
advertising network
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 550,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$12,933,561
Section 11.286. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For grants to: organizations that promote and facilitate adoptions,
maternity homes, diaper banks, and organizations providing
material support and other assistance to individuals facing an
unintended pregnancy to help those individuals give birth to their
unborn children
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 11.287. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a grant to an organization located in a city with more than thirty-six
thousand five hundred but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants
that promotes and facilitates adoptions, maternity homes,
material support and other assistance to individuals facing an
unintended pregnancy to help those individuals give birth to their
unborn children
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 250,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$500,000
Section 11.288. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 39
For a not-for-profit organization, located in any city not within a county,
for a male mentoring program founded in 1984
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$126,000
Section 11.290. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit located in county with more than one million
inhabitants and founded in 2015 for substance abuse treatment,
family support services, access to healthy foods and adequate
shelter
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$500,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,000,000
Section 11.291. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city not within a county
whose mission is to ensure equitable access to nutritious food and
essential resources for all community members, regardless of
socioeconomic status
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$250,000
Section 11.292. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization founded in 2017 to open a cooperatively
owned grocery store that will provide locally grown, fresh
produce from state farmers, and other locally sourced products
and meats located in any county with more than one million
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 11.295. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For community services programs provided by Community Action
Agencies or other not-for-profit organizations under the
provisions of the Community Services Block Grant
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$23,637,056

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 40
Section 11.297. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For funding a multi-modal, on-demand, micro-transit provision and/or
coordination in rural and suburban markets to enhance access to
health services (including, without limitation, mental, physical,
dental health services and pharmaceutical services); workforce
development training, to include educational opportunities,
apprenticeship programs, internships and other related workforce
programs and for mobility coordination, primarily for individuals
in areas of the state under-served by existing public transit
services and routes
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 11.300. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For an organization in county with more than twenty-two thousand but
fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than one thousand four hundred but fewer than
one thousand nine hundred inhabitants that supports programs
and non-profits promoting health, wellness, and families
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$100,000
Section 11.301. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a 501(c)(3) non-profit corporation with its principal place of business
located in a city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but
fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants that currently
provides intensive family services to low-income families with
children in multiple counties in southwest Missouri through a
federal Regional Partnership Grant to increase its capacity to
provide intensive family services for low-income families with
children in southwest Missouri
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$600,000
Section 11.305. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 41
For the Food Distribution Program, the receipt and disbursement of
Donated Food Program payments and for the Local Food
Purchase Assistance Cooperative Program
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$6,777,682
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus – 2021 Fund
(2456) ....................................................................................................... 3,748,530
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,526,212
Section 11.310. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program, provided the
eligible household income does not exceed one hundred and fifty
percent (150%) of the federal poverty level or sixty percent
(60%) of the state median income (SMI)
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ...................................$101,620,002
Section 11.315. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a city with more than ten thousand but fewer than eleven thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than one million
inhabitants for a workforce development program for
underserved youth provided the funds are used for tools, supplies,
career training and support services
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$275,000
Section 11.320. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization located in a city not within a county that
builds homes and communities that is dedicated to eliminating
substandard housing in a city not within a county and empowers
local families to build and purchase their own home
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 11.325. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For grants to not-for-profit organizations for services and programs to
assist victims of domestic violence, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 42
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................3,000,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,600,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus – 2021
Fund (2456) ......................................................................................................3,204,219
For emergency shelter services to assist victims of domestic violence
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................562,137
For a nonprofit organization located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county to support domestic violence survivors, provides essential
resources to end period poverty, empowers college bound and
non-traditional students and inspires cancer patients
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ................................................................................................. 50,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$13,416,356
Section 11.326. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city not within a county to
provide civil legal aid and create opportunities to build resiliency
and advocate for justice
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$200,000
Section 11.327. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization located in a county with more than one
million inhabitants that provides a 39 bed domestic violence
program for abused women and their children, provided funds are
used to expand the organization’s capacity
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$250,000
Section 11.330. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Victims of Crime Act (VOCA) Unit
For the administrative expenses of the Victims of Crime Act program
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$27,827

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 43
Personal Service ..................................................................................................286,501
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 100,049
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146) ..........................................................386,550
For training and technical assistance expenses for the Victims of Crime
Act program
Expense and Equipment
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146) ............................................... 500,000
Total (Not to exceed 5.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$914,377
Section 11.335. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Office of Workforce & Community Initiatives
For the Victims of Crime Act (VOCA) Unit
For grants to not-for-profit organizations for services and programs to
assist victims of crime
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$25,000,000
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146) ............................................... 49,331,537
Total .........................................................................................................................$74,331,537
Section 11.340. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For grants to not-for-profit organizations for services and programs to
assist victims of sexual assault, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,250,000 one-time) ....................$3,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus – 2021 Fund
(2456) ....................................................................................................... 1,231,936
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,231,936
Section 11.350. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division administrative expenses, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,999,971
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,738,275
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,738,246
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,915,795

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 44
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,031,094
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,946,889
Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................944,470
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus – 2021
Fund (2456) ...........................................................................................................23,032
Expense and Equipment
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ........................................... 55,944
Total (Not to exceed 75.43 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$7,708,581
Section 11.355. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Child Abuse and Neglect Hotline Unit
For administrative expenses, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,467,887
Expense and Equipment (including $120,233 one-time) ......................... 283,899
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 89.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$5,751,786
Section 11.360. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from
Section 11.360 to 11.355, and further provided that fifty percent
(50%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.360, 11.370,
and 11.375, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.905
For the Children’s Division field staff and operations administrative
expenses
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$45,168,617
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,098,188
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................47,266,805
Personal Service .............................................................................................42,952,511
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,192,497
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................46,145,008

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 45
Personal Service .............................................................................................14,812,919
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,818,397
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................16,631,316
Personal Service ....................................................................................................97,411
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 35,558
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................132,969
For recruitment and retention services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,226,992
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,101,008
For the expansion of a foster care portal software that can be accessed by
children’s division caseworkers, licensed foster families, foster
care licensure applicants, parents or guardians of children in
foster care, and other key parties to ensure streamlined
communication and information sharing
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................750,000
For expanding the reach of the Foster Care Wellness Pilot Module
statewide
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,925,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 1,925,000
Total (Not to exceed 1,781.86 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$117,104,098
Section 11.363. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For Psychotropic Medication Reviews
For administration to monitor and track prescribed and administered
psychotropic medications to children in the custody of the
Children's Division, assist in the collection of medical records,
ensure informed consent of family members, provide secondary
reviews to prevent excessive dosages, and administer pre-service
and annual training to foster care case management staff and
resource providers
Personal Service ................................................................................................$250,134
Expense and Equipment (including $38,609 one-time) ........................... 84,377
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................334,511
Personal Service ....................................................................................................72,014

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 46
Expense and Equipment (including $11,116 one-time) ........................... 24,293
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..............................................96,307
Personal Service ....................................................................................................36,007
Expense and Equipment (including $5,558 one-time) ............................. 12,146
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 48,153
Total (Not to exceed 6.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$478,971
Section 11.364. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For tuition assistance
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$77,000
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 231,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$308,000
Section 11.365. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For diligent search for relative placements
Personal Service ................................................................................................$749,220
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 188,633
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................937,853
Personal Service ..................................................................................................301,607
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 74,559
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 376,166
Total (Not to exceed 24.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,314,019
Section 11.370. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For administrative expenses of the Family Centered Services (FCS)
program, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.360, 11.370, and 11.375
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,697,320
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 213,573
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,910,893

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 47
Personal Service ..................................................................................................805,879
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 65,681
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 871,560
Total (Not to exceed 20.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,782,453
Section 11.375. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For Team Decision Making (TDM) administrative expenses, provided
five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment, and further provided fifty percent
(50%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.360, 11.370,
and 11.375
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,730,173
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 213,676
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,943,849
Personal Service ..................................................................................................842,595
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 65,695
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 908,290
Total (Not to exceed 20.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,852,139
Section 11.380. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the development and integration of a new comprehensive child
welfare information system
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$2,000,000
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .............................................................. 5,337,573
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,337,573
Section 11.383. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For a nonprofit organization founded in 1996 located in a city with more
than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
one county that helps to build a healthier community by leading
the multidisciplinary response through the prevention,
identification, and treatment of child abuse and violence to
construct a child welfare training center
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,500,000
Section 11.385. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 48
For the Children’s Division
For Children’s Division staff training, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
For administrative staff expenses
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$55,294
Expense and Equipment (including $7,945 one-time) ............................. 20,476
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................75,770
Personal Service ....................................................................................................55,295
Expense and Equipment (including $7,945 one-time) ............................. 20,476
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..............................................75,771
Personal Service ....................................................................................................12,288
Expense and Equipment (including $1,765 one-time) ............................. 4,551
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ...........................16,839
For contracted training expenses
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,087,513
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................590,243
For specialized investigation skills training
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus – 2021
Fund (2456) .............................................................................................. 569,763
Total (Not to exceed 2.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$2,415,899
Section 11.390. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For a statewide specialist focused on prevention and response to sex
trafficking and sexual exploitation of children and for services for
child victims, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$63,586
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,053
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................70,639
Personal Service ....................................................................................................37,345
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,141
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 41,486

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 49
Total (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$112,125
Section 11.395. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For prevention of human trafficking
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus – 2021
Fund (2456) .......................................................................................................$274,937
For grants to nonprofit organizations for statewide prevention and
education efforts concerning human trafficking through a
program that reaches public and charter schools
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 150,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$424,937
Section 11.400. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For prevention services and programs for children and families to assist
children to remain safely in their homes and prevent the need for
foster care placement
Brief Strategic Family Therapy (BSFT)
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$518,893
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................518,894
Parent-Child Interaction Therapy (PCIT)
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................497,815
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................497,815
For the Birth Match Program as set forth in Section, 210.156 RSMo.
Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................110,755
Program Distribution
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 558,065
Total (Not to exceed 2.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$2,702,237

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 50
Section 11.405. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420, 11.425,
11.440, 11.465, 11.475, and 11.480, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
For children’s treatment services including, but not limited to, home-
based services, day treatment services, preventive services,
family reunification services, or intensive in-home services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,268,036
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................9,796,892
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) .............................................................................50,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................425,286
For crisis care
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 2,316,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$27,856,214
Section 11.406. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For the establishment and funding of a trauma intervention specialist to
enhance the child welfare response by integrating therapeutic
assessment, triage, and intervention throughout the duration of a
child’s case for a nonprofit organization located in a county with
more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twelve
thousand six hundred but fewer than fifteen thousand inhabitants
whose purpose is to oversee the establishment, operation, and
maintenance of mental health services for children and youth
ages 0 to 19 and their families within the county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$100,000
Section 11.408. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For a not-for-profit community organization located in county with more
than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants to provide
assistance to at-risk families, children in-care and families, post

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 51
permanency families, reunification families, and social workers
and families whose mission is to give hope to those who have
slipped through the cracks of traditional community assistance
programs and provides essential resources
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$250,000
Section 11.410. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For court ordered drug testing
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,081,076
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 318,924
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,400,000
Section 11.415. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For costs associated with the implementation of the Family First
Prevention Services Act (FFPSA)
For grants to providers to develop and provide community settings
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (one-time) .....................$4,000,000
For the development and start-up of new prevention programs that meet
FFPSA criteria
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (one-time) ............... 1,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,000,000
Section 11.420. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For foster care placement special expenses, respite services, and
transportation expenses; expenses related to training of foster
parents, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420, 11.425, 11.440, 11.465, 11.475,
and 11.480
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,521,178
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................991,056
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,052,169
For foster care treatment costs in an outdoor learning foster care program
that is licensed or accredited for treatment programming with the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 52
reimbursement rate for this service determined by a cost study for
payment in addition to other service rates for the foster child,
provided that such reimbursement rate shall not exceed the
appropriation authority, and further provided that no funds shall
be expended to any vendor who fails to report a crime as required
by law and/or failed to remove an employee from duties related
to the treatment program upon becoming aware of a charge or
indictment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................183,385
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................316,615
For awards to licensed community-based foster care and adoption
recruitment programs
From Foster Care and Adoptive Parents Recruitment and Retention
Fund (1979) .............................................................................................. 15,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,079,403
Section 11.421. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For a foster care ministry organization that provides resources and
training to help parents provide a temporary or forever home for
a child in foster care through in-home coaching, mentoring foster
families on a regular basis, and maintaining a relationship with
the foster family to ensure success and stability for the child
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,050,000
Section 11.425. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For foster care maintenance payments, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420,
11.425, 11.440, 11.465, 11.475, and 11.480
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$56,176,475
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................21,507,505
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................20,314,073
From Alternative Care Trust Fund (1905) .......................................................... 2,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$99,998,053

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 53
Section 11.430. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For room and board expenses for children placed in a Therapeutic Foster
Care (TFC) home setting
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,566,746
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 1,902,621
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,469,367
Section 11.435. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For room and board expenses for children placed in Qualified Residential
Treatment Program designated facilities, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within this
section
For placements in a Qualified Residential Treatment Program/non-
Institution for Mental Disease (QRTP/non-IMD) designated
facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,835,914
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................5,359,649
For placements in Qualified Residential Treatment Programs/Institution
for Mental Disease (QRTP/IMD) designated facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,159,992
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 680,912
Total .........................................................................................................................$24,036,467
Section 11.440. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For residential treatment placements and therapeutic treatment services;
and for the diversion of children from inpatient psychiatric
treatment and services provided through comprehensive,
expedited permanency systems of care for children and families,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420, 11.425, 11.440, 11.465, 11.475,
and 11.480
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$22,594,667
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................13,351,973
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 7,310,026
Total .........................................................................................................................$43,256,666

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 54
Section 11.445. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For contractual payments for expenses related to training of foster
parents
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$603,513
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 372,934
Total ..............................................................................................................................$976,447
Section 11.450. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For foster parent support
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,208,037
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 1,246,315
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,454,352
Section 11.455. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For costs associated with attending post-secondary education including,
but not limited to tuition, books, fees, room and board for current
or former foster youth, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$188,848
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,050,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 450,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,688,848
Section 11.460. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For comprehensive case management contracts through community-
based organizations as described in Section 210.112, RSMo; the
purpose of these contracts shall be to provide a system of care for
children living in foster care, independent living, or residential
care settings; services eligible under this provision may include,
but are not limited to, case management, foster care, residential
treatment, intensive in-home services, family reunification
services, and specialized recruitment and training of foster care
families, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 11.905

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 55
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$35,251,584
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 21,685,931
Total .........................................................................................................................$56,937,515
Section 11.465. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For adoption subsidy payments, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between subsections within this section, and further
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420, 11.425, 11.440, 11.465, 11.475,
and 11.480
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$55,211,954
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................51,994,222
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................14,439,396
For guardianship subsidy payments, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between subsections within this section, and
further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420, 11.425, 11.440, 11.465, 11.475,
and 11.480
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................19,850,562
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................15,895,630
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 11,860,598
Total .......................................................................................................................$169,252,362
Section 11.470. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For kinship navigator services
Program Distribution
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..........................................$372,318
Section 11.475. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420, 11.425,
11.440, 11.465, 11.475, and 11.480
For a Family Resource Center with a primary office location, in any city
with more than one hundred five thousand but fewer than one
hundred twenty-five thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $250,000 one-time) .......................$3,448,434

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 56
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................5,807,580
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................391,910
For a Family Resource Center with a primary office location, in any city
with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand
inhabitants and partially located in a county with more than
seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $250,000 one-time) .........................3,309,828
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................4,686,171
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................326,023
For a Family Resource Center with a primary office location in any
county with more than one million inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $250,000 one-time) .........................2,995,302
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................3,889,565
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................271,142
For a Family Resource Center located in a city with more than sixteen
thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county, and located in a city with more
than four thousand nine hundred but fewer than five thousand six
hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than
fourteen thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand
nine hundred but fewer than five thousand five hundred
inhabitants, and located in a city with more than four thousand
nine hundred but fewer than five thousand six hundred
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than
twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................600,000
For a Family Resource Center located in a county with more than
seventeen thousand six hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three hundred
but fewer than one thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................300,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 57
For a Family Resource Center located in any city with more than thirty-
six thousand five hundred but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
For additional Behavioral Intervention Services in areas of need
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 900,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$27,425,955
Section 11.480. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For independent living placements and transitional living services,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420, 11.425, 11.440, 11.465, 11.475,
and 11.480
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,947,584
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................4,171,219
For a non-profit organization with locations in a county with more than
two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred
thousand inhabitants and a county with more than thirty thousand
but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than thirteen
thousand inhabitants that works to empower youth in foster care
and families in crisis to prevent the cycle of trauma, family
separation, and homelessness
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,118,803
Section 11.485. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For Regional Child Assessment Centers, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,249,475
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,700,000
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 501,048
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,450,523
Section 11.490. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 58
For the Children’s Division
For Regional Child Assessment Centers
For services and programs administered through the statewide
association of Regional Child Assessment Centers aimed at
preventing and combating the commercial sexual exploitation of
children
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 11.491. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For a Child Assessment Center in a county with more than two hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$3,000,000
Section 11.495. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For residential placement payments to counties for children in the
custody of juvenile courts
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..........................................$175,000
Section 11.500. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For Court Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) IV-E allowable training
costs
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..........................................$150,000
Section 11.505. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Grant and Children’s Justice
Act Grant
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$1,251,341
Section 11.509. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For payments to one or more contractors to assist the Division with
application and administration of benefits on behalf of a child or
youth and to establish and administer accounts for a child or
youth which include but not limited to a special needs trust, a

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 59
pooled special needs trust, an ABLE account, or any other trust
account
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,356,992
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 507,008
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,864,000
Section 11.510. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For transactions involving personal funds of children to: transfer funds
to accounts set up for the child; to make payments directly to the
child; to return the funds to the corresponding funding agency; to
fund "Unmet needs", needs for which the division is not required
by law to provide financial support; or dispose of the funds as
otherwise required by law
From Alternative Care Trust Fund (1905) ...............................................................$14,000,000
Section 11.550. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Youth Services
For the Central Office and regional offices, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,104,048
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 81,097
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,185,145
Personal Service ..................................................................................................262,539
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,855
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ...........................................................................276,394
Personal Service ..................................................................................................984,541
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 86,779
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,071,320
Expense and Equipment
From Youth Services Treatment Fund (1843) ..................................................... 999
Total (Not to exceed 39.30 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,533,858
Section 11.555. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Youth Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 60
For treatment services, including foster care and contractual payments,
provided up to $500,000 can be used for juvenile court diversion,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between federal
funds, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.905
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$25,775,382
Expense and Equipment (including $193,345 one-time) ......................... 1,269,481
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................27,044,863
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,257,097
Expense and Equipment (including $31,476 one-time) ........................... 3,138,715
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ........................................................................8,395,812
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,149,407
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,125,033
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,274,440
Personal Service .............................................................................................13,190,742
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,514,715
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................14,705,457
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,999,304
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,854,832
From DOSS Educational Improvement Fund (1620) ..................................................7,854,136
Personal Service ..................................................................................................178,072
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,106
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................187,178
Expense and Equipment
From Youth Services Products Fund (1764) ......................................................................5,000
For overtime to non-exempt state employees and/or for paying otherwise
authorized personal service expenditures in lieu of such overtime
payments; non-exempt state employees identified by Section
105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any remaining funds to be
used to pay overtime to any other state employees
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,133,414

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 61
For payment distribution of Social Security benefits received on behalf
of youth in care
From Division of Youth Services Child Benefits Fund (1727) ........................... 200,000
Total (Not to exceed 1,016.38 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$61,800,300
Section 11.560. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Youth Services
For incentive payments to counties for community-based treatment
programs for youth, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,479,486
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................. 500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,979,486
Section 11.600. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For administrative services, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.905
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,558,319
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,203,101
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $500,000 one-time) .......................10,761,420
Personal Service ...............................................................................................8,983,345
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,187,642
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (including
$500,000 one-time) ........................................................................................19,170,987
Personal Service ..................................................................................................477,189
Expense and Equipment ............................................................................ 1,286,088
From FMAP Enhancement - Expansion Fund (2466) .................................................1,763,277
Personal Service ..................................................................................................555,338
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 55,553
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114) ............................................................................610,891
Personal Service ..................................................................................................528,593
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 488,041
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ...................................................1,016,634
Personal Service ..................................................................................................135,943

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 62
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 232,708
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) .................................................368,651
Personal Service ....................................................................................................34,086
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 356
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ...............................................34,442
Personal Service ..................................................................................................113,122
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,281
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) ......................................................123,403
Personal Service ..................................................................................................566,877
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 41,385
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................608,262
Personal Service ....................................................................................................57,920
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 425,372
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ....................................483,292
Expense and Equipment
From Life Sciences Research Trust Fund (1763) ...............................................................3,000
Personal Service
From Missouri Rx Plan Fund (1779) ..............................................................................443,129
Personal Service ....................................................................................................23,682
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 128,466
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) ................... 152,148
Total (Not to exceed 239.70 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$35,539,536
Section 11.605. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For clinical services management related to the administration of the MO
HealthNet Pharmacy fee-for-service and managed care programs
and administration of the Missouri Rx Plan, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$461,917
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................12,214,032

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 63
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114) ............................................................................497,648
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ......................................................924,911
From Missouri Rx Plan Fund (1779) ................................................................... 62,947
Total .........................................................................................................................$14,161,455
Section 11.610. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For MO HealthNet Transformation initiatives
Personal Service ................................................................................................$622,214
Expense and Equipment (including $90,118 one-time) ........................... 3,282,863
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,905,077
Personal Service ..................................................................................................274,717
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,379,326
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 7,654,043
Total (Not to exceed 13.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$11,559,120
Section 11.615. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the MO HealthNet Data Management Office administrative expenses
Personal Service ................................................................................................$225,394
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,926
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................237,320
Personal Service ..................................................................................................453,477
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 23,632
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 477,109
Total (Not to exceed 10.00 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................$714,429
Section 11.620. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For fees associated with third-party collections and other revenue
maximization cost avoidance fees
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$4,250,000
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ........................................... 4,250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$8,500,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 64
Section 11.625. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Missouri Medicaid Information System (MMIS)
For the operation of the information systems, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between subsections within this section, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 11.905
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $5,800,000 one-time) ..................$30,541,092
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (including
$20,200,000 one-time) ...................................................................................94,389,495
From FMAP Enhancement – Expansion Fund (2466) ................................................2,416,534
From Uncompensated Care Fund (1108) ........................................................................430,000
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................1,591,687
For the operation of the Business Intelligence Solution – Enterprise Data
Warehouse (BIS-EDW)
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,961,638
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................7,684,913
For the operation of the Beneficiary Support and Premiums Collections
Solution and Services (BSPC) – Enrollment Broker
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,854,462
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................4,934,119
For the operation of the Clinical Management Services and Pharmacy
Claims and Prior Authorization (CMSP)
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,138,668
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................15,303,167
For the operation of the pharmacy system and support services-Pharmacy
Solution
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,500,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................13,500,000
For the operation of the Managed Care Contract Management Tool

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 65
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................700,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 6,300,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$189,245,775
Section 11.630. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the procurement that is in compliance of Chapter 34 RSMo. for
technology for a statewide closed-loop social service referral
platform for addressing the social determinants of health, defined
as nonclinical community and social factors such as housing,
food security, transportation, financial strain, and interpersonal
safety, that affect health, functioning, and quality-of-life
outcomes; the platform shall: share information securely and
consistent with all applicable federal and state laws regarding
individual consent, personal health information, privacy, public
records, and data security; provide support and be made available
statewide, at minimum, to community-based organizations, state
agencies; hospital system, county programs, and safety net
healthcare providers; identify social care needs through
embedded screening and other data analytics tools; coordinate
social care referrals and interventions through closed-loop
referrals which include not only if the referral occurred but the
outcome of the referral; track and measure the outcomes of
referrals and the impact of interventions; support client-level
community health records where this information is
longitudinally stored; and create a longitudinal view of a client's
social care opportunities, the social care needs identified for this
client, the social care services that this client has been connected
to, and the outcomes of these social care interventions over time;
the services procured with the platform shall be interoperable
with existing closed-loop systems in operation and must include
a community engagement team to support the development of
multisector network, and provide the identification of, training,
onboarding, and ongoing support for community-based
organizations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $2,000,000 one-time) ....................$4,500,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (including

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 66
$2,000,000 one-time) ............................................................................... 4,500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,000,000
Section 11.635. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the purpose of supporting the transformation of any or all of the
state's existing Health Information Exchanges into a Health Data
Utility by providing funds to enhance the existing HIE
infrastructure for the purpose of data analysis focused on
supporting MO HealthNet. Data analytics provided through the
HIE(s) shall provide analysis to MO HealthNet and members
focused on enhancing care delivery and system efficiency in the
MO HealthNet program and improving health care delivery and
outcomes in under-served communities. All HIEs shall be
required to maintain strict compliance with all patient privacy
protections under HIPAA and any other applicable state or
federal laws
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 45,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$50,000,000
Section 11.640. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Money Follows the Person Program
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$1,532,549
Section 11.700. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
For pharmaceutical payments under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program, professional fees for pharmacists, and for a
comprehensive chronic care risk management program, provided
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection
and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735,
11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830,
and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$167,733,904
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................748,801,531
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114) .....................................................................260,835,622

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 67
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ...................................................4,217,574
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ........................................35,376,122
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................3,543,350
From Premium Fund (1885) ........................................................................................3,800,000
For Medicare Part D Clawback payments, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 383,477,210
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,607,785,313
Section 11.705. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the purpose of funding pharmaceutical payments under the Missouri
Rx Plan authorized by Sections 208.780 through 208.798, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,235,335
From Missouri Rx Plan Fund (1779) ................................................................... 1,188,774
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,424,109
Section 11.710. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance payments as provided by law
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................$37,990,000
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) .................................. 20,010,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$58,000,000
Section 11.715. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For physician services and related services including, but not limited to,
clinic and podiatry services, telemedicine services, physician-
sponsored services and fees, laboratory and x-ray services,
asthma related services, diabetes prevention and obesity related
services, services provided by chiropractic physicians, and
family planning services under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program, and for a comprehensive chronic care risk management
program, and Major Medical Prior Authorization, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 68
11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and
11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$205,478,698
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................377,608,324
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ...............................................10,000
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................1,427,081
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ......................................................241,046
For payment of physician and related services to Certified Community
Behavioral Health Organizations (CCBHO), provided that
Applied Behavioral Analysis (ABA) services are included in the
CCBHO Prospective Payment System
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................75,180,484
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ............................................................... 140,455,016
Total .......................................................................................................................$800,400,649
Section 11.720. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Program for All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE), provided
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection
and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735,
11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830,
and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,155,311
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ............................................................... 10,776,200
Total .........................................................................................................................$16,931,511
Section 11.725. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For dental services under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service program,
including adult dental procedure codes (Tier 1-6), provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755,
11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and
11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,795,230
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................9,125,600
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 71,162
Total .........................................................................................................................$13,991,992

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 69
Section 11.730. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to third-party insurers, employers, or policy holders for
health insurance, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between this section and Sections 11.700, 11.715,
11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775,
11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$130,235,217
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ............................................................... 251,875,949
Total .......................................................................................................................$382,111,166
Section 11.735. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For funding long-term care services
For care in nursing facilities under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program and for contracted services to develop model policies
and practices that improve the quality of life for long-term care
residents, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from this subsection to the
value based incentive payments to nursing facilities subsection
within this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$336,793,119
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................728,751,844
From Uncompensated Care Fund (1108) ...................................................................58,516,478
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ...................................................6,992,981
For value-based incentive payments to nursing facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................12,271,136
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................22,507,067
For home health for the elderly under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 70
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,101,019
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................1,889,495
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 159,305
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,168,982,444
Section 11.740. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For funding long-term care services
For Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance payments as provided
by law
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .................................................................$244,303,447
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ........................ 128,678,915
Total .......................................................................................................................$372,982,362
Section 11.745. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For rehabilitative and preventative care services ordered by a physician
and delivered by an Assisted Living Facility, provided one
hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ............................................................... 1
Total .........................................................................................................................................$2
Section 11.750. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For publicly funded long-term care services and support contracts and
funding supplemental payments for care in nursing facilities
under the nursing facility upper payment limit
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................$7,080,493
From Long Term Support UPL Fund (1724) ....................................................... 3,870,275
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,950,768
Section 11.755. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For all other non-institutional services including, but not limited to,
rehabilitation, optometry, audiology, ambulance, non-emergency
medical transportation, durable medical equipment, and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 71
eyeglasses under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service program, and
for rehabilitation services provided by residential treatment
facilities as authorized by the Children’s Division for children in
the care and custody of the Children’s Division, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755,
11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and
11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$118,126,658
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................253,390,880
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ................................1,414,043
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................194,881
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) .........................10,159,809
For non-emergency medical transportation, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................21,390,544
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................40,273,219
For the federal share of MO HealthNet reimbursable non-emergency
medical transportation for public entities
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ............................................................... 2,555,469
Total .......................................................................................................................$447,505,503
Section 11.760. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to providers of ground emergency medical transportation
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................$54,286,596
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ......................... 29,673,650
Total .........................................................................................................................$83,960,246
Section 11.765. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For complex rehabilitation technology items classified within the
Medicare program as of January 1, 2014 as durable medical
equipment that are individually configured for individuals to
meet their specific and unique medical, physical, and functional

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 72
needs and capacities for basic activities of daily living and
instrumental activities of daily living identified as medically
necessary to prevent hospitalization and/or institutionalization of
a complex needs patient; such items shall include, but not be
limited to, complex rehabilitation power wheelchairs, highly
configurable manual wheelchairs, adaptive seating and
positioning systems, and other specialized equipment such as
standing frames and gait trainers, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between this section and Sections 11.700,
11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770,
11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,727,278
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ............................................................... 7,523,252
Total .........................................................................................................................$12,250,530
Section 11.770. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payment to comprehensive prepaid health care plans for the general
plan as provided by federal or state law or for payments to
programs authorized by the Frail Elderly Demonstration Project
Waiver as provided by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act
of 1990 (P.L.101-508, Section 4744) and by Section 208.152
(16), RSMo,; provided that the department shall implement
programs or measures to achieve cost-savings through
emergency room services reform, and further provided that MO
HealthNet eligibles described in Section 501(a)(1)(D) of Title V
of the Social Security Act may voluntarily enroll in the Managed
Care Program, and further provided that the Department shall
direct its contracted actuary to develop an Aged, Blind, and
Disabled rate cell inside the MO HealthNet Managed Care
program to reflect the cost of those members choosing to be
enrolled in a managed care plan, and further provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$25,325,523
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................1,240,321,126

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 73
From Uncompensated Care Fund (1108) ...................................................................33,848,436
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) .........................................................................18,590,380
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ..........................................155,083,260
From Healthy Families Trust Fund (1625) ................................................................14,435,373
From Life Sciences Research Trust Fund (1763) ......................................................26,697,272
From Medicaid Stabilization Fund (1809) (one-time) .............................................421,507,198
From Premium Fund (1885) ........................................................................................9,259,854
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) ...........................2,892,711
For supplemental Medicare parity payments to primary care physicians
relating to maternal-fetal medicine, neonatology, and pediatric
cardiology
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,498,587
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................2,854,045
For supplemental payments to Tier 1 Safety Net Hospitals, or to any
affiliated physician group that provides physicians for any Tier 1
Safety Net Hospital, for physician and other healthcare
professional services as approved by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................44,699,437
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) .............................................................................................................24,433,204
For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo., when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................25,954,375
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ......................... 13,670,624
Total ....................................................................................................................$2,061,071,405
Section 11.771. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For a non-for-profit healthcare system to contract with and provide funds
to serve all patients regardless of income who is based in any city
with more than sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county,
provided that funds are to be used by the not-for-profit healthcare

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 74
system for the planning, design, construction, and equipment of
a radiation oncology center that has received necessary approval
from the Missouri Health Facilities Review Committee for
included major medical equipment, to be located in any county
with more than twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
fourteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants,
based on the 2020 Census Redistricting Data (Public Law 94-
171) of the United States Census Bureau
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$15,000,000
For a nonprofit healthcare foundation in any county with more than
twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
than twelve thousand inhabitants, and in any county with more
than fourteen thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five
thousand five hundred but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................25,000,000
For a community owned, not-for-profit medical center located in any city
with more than eleven thousand but fewer than twelve thousand
five hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county
with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants, for the purchase of a surgical robot
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,000,000
For a hospital located in any city with more than ten thousand but fewer
than eleven thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a
county with more than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five
thousand inhabitants for renovations and to purchase new
equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,000,000
For a not-for profit medical center located in any city with more than
sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants
and partially located in a county with more than thirty-five
thousand but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants for
renovations and to purchase medical equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................2,037,900

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 75
For the construction of a community health center located in a city not
within a county that will provide primary care, pharmaceutical,
and behavioral health services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 1,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$46,037,900
Section 11.775. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payment to a comprehensive prepaid health care plan for the
specialty plan as provided by federal or state law or for payments
to programs authorized by the Frail Elderly Demonstration
Project Waiver as provided by the Omnibus Budget
Reconciliation Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-508, Section 4744) and by
Section 208.152 (16), RSMo.; and further provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$122,441,338
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................221,844,455
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ............................................21,102,611
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) ..............................300,000
For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo., when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................1,760,313
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ......................... 927,188
Total .......................................................................................................................$368,375,905
Section 11.780. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For hospital care under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service program,
graduate medical education, and for a comprehensive chronic
care risk management program, provided that the MO HealthNet
Division shall track payments to out-of-state hospitals by
location, and further provided the department seek a waiver of
the institutions for mental disease (IMD) exclusion for inpatient
mental health treatment for MO HealthNet participants in

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 76
psychiatric hospitals pursuant to Section 12003 of the 21st
Century Cures Act with the state share through the federal
reimbursement allowance; and further provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$62,217,790
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................343,426,089
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ..........................................112,216,293
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ...............................................15,709
For rate increases for inpatient hospital psychiatric care
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................8,000,000
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................16,500,000
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) .................................................500,000
For Safety Net Payments
From Healthy Families Trust Fund (1625) ................................................................30,365,444
For the Remote Patient Monitoring program that includes in-home visits
and/or phone contact by a nurse care manager or electronic
monitor; the purpose of such program shall be to ensure that
patients are discharged from hospitals to an appropriate level of
care and services and that targeted MO HealthNet beneficiaries
with chronic illnesses and high-risk pregnancies receive care in
the most cost-effective setting
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ..........................................................................200,000
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) .................................................200,000
For the Rx Reminder program, facilitating medication compliance for
chronically ill MO HealthNet participants identified by the
division as having high utilization of acute care because of poor
management of their condition
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ..........................................................................215,000
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ...................................... 215,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$574,071,325
Section 11.785. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 77
For the Transformation of Rural Community Health (ToRCH) Rural
Hospital Health Hub
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,750,000
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................7,500,000
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ...................................... 3,750,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,000,000
Section 11.790. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to Tier 1 Safety Net Hospitals for enhanced rates to
providers and to plan and develop a regional Barriers to Care
proposal while maximizing eligible costs for federal Medicaid
funds, utilizing current state and local funding sources as match
for services that are not currently matched with federal Medicaid
payments
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................$17,613,590
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ....................................................................................................... 1,709,202
Total .........................................................................................................................$19,322,792
Section 11.793. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For indirect medical education (IME) payments to public acute care
safety net hospitals who serve as the primary teaching hospitals
for the state’s two public medical schools, University of
Missouri-Columbia School of Medicine and University of
Missouri-Kansas City School of Medicine; payments from this
section are for the difference between IME payments paid under
the Diagnosis-Related Group (DRG) methodology and 100% of
allowable funds
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ....................................................................$12,743,511
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ....................................................................................................... 6,965,591
Total .........................................................................................................................$19,709,102
Section 11.795. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.905
For Federally Qualified Health Centers (FQHCs)

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 78
For grants to Federally Qualified Health Centers
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$757,732
For a community health worker initiative that focuses on providing
casework services to high utilizers of MO HealthNet Services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,500,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,500,000
For statewide women and minority health care outreach programs
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,029,796
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 2,029,796
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,817,324
Section 11.800. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For Federally Qualified Health Centers (FQHCs)
For a grant program for a substance abuse prevention network for a
FQHC located in a county with more than two hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................250,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................1,100,000
For a grant program for a substance abuse prevention network
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................250,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 2,100,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,700,000
Section 11.805. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to technical assistance contractors under Section 330(l) or
330(m) of the Public Health Services Act to assist Federally
Qualified Health Centers (FQHCs) with outreach and
engagement of Medicaid beneficiaries assigned to FQHCs, for
addressing gaps in preventive services and management of
chronic conditions, and for incentive payments
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,918,645

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 79
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 1,918,645
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,837,290
Section 11.810. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For health homes, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this section and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,142,744
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................21,244,936
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ...................................... 7,893,011
Total .........................................................................................................................$35,280,691
Section 11.815. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For a health home for children with medically complex conditions
pursuant to the Medicaid Services Investment and Accountability
Act of 2019 H.R.1839 otherwise known as Advancing Care for
Exceptional (ACE) Kids Act
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$404,685
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ............................................................... 740,353
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,145,038
Section 11.820. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to hospitals under the Federal Reimbursement Allowance
Program including state costs to pay for an independent audit of
Disproportionate Share Hospital payments as required by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, for the expenses of
the Poison Control Center in order to provide services to all
hospitals within the state
For a continuation of the services provided through Medicaid Emergency
Psychiatric Demonstration as required by Section 208.152(16),
RSMo
From Title XIX – Federal Fund (1163) ..............................................................$1,009,829,930
From Title XXI – Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...........................................................................................................103,540,136
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ...................................... 538,602,211

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 80
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,651,972,277
Section 11.825. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For funding programs to enhance access to care for uninsured children
using fee-for-service, prepaid health plans, or other alternative
service delivery and reimbursement methodology approved by
the director of the Department of Social Services, provided that
families of children receiving services under this section shall pay
the following premiums to be eligible to receive such services:
zero percent on the amount of a family's income which is less
than or equal to 150 percent of the federal poverty level; four
percent on the amount of a family's income which is less than or
equal to 185 percent of the federal poverty level but greater than
150 percent of the federal poverty level; eight percent on the
amount of a family's income which is less than or equal to 225
percent of the federal poverty level but greater than 185 percent
of the federal poverty level; fourteen percent on the amount of a
family's income which is less than or equal to 300 percent of the
federal poverty level but greater than 225 percent of the federal
poverty level not to exceed five percent of total income; families
with an annual income of more than 300 percent of the federal
poverty level are ineligible for this program, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$121,000,402
From Title XXI – Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...........................................................................................................383,898,531
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ..............................................7,719,204
For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo., when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XXI – Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...............................................................................................................1,896,325
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ......................... 603,675
Total .......................................................................................................................$515,118,137

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 81
Section 11.830. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Show-Me Healthy Babies Program authorized by Section
208.662, RSMo, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this section and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$26,969,657
From Title XXI – Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ....................................................................................................... 81,266,553
Total .......................................................................................................................$108,236,210
Section 11.835. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For MO HealthNet services for the Department of Elementary and
Secondary Education under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$242,525
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................ 139,864,081
Total .......................................................................................................................$140,106,606
Section 11.840. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For medical benefits for blind individuals ineligible for MO HealthNet
coverage who receive the Missouri Blind Pension cash grant,
provided that individuals under this section shall pay the
following premiums to be eligible to receive such services: zero
percent on the amount of a family's income which is less than 150
percent of the federal poverty level; four percent on the amount
of a family's income which is less than 185 percent of the federal
poverty level but greater than or equal to 150 percent of the
federal poverty level; eight percent of the amount on a family's
income which is less than 225 percent of the federal poverty level
but greater than or equal to 185 percent of the federal poverty
level; fourteen percent on the amount of a family's income which
is less than 300 percent of the federal poverty level but greater
than or equal to 225 percent of the federal poverty level not to

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 82
exceed five percent of total income; families with an annual
income equal to or greater than 300 percent of the federal poverty
level are ineligible for this program, and further provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755,
11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.810, 11.825, 11.830, and
11.840, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.905
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$24,840,169
Section 11.845. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For program distributions related to Section 36(c) of Article IV of the
Missouri Constitution
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) ...................................$3,762,683,062
From FMAP Enhancement – Expansion Fund (2466) ............................................352,525,940
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ..........................................1,693,020
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ................................1,580,152
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) ..............................565,267
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ............................................61,825,313
For supplemental payments to Tier 1 Safety Net Hospitals, or to any
affiliated physician group that provides physicians for any Tier 1
Safety Net Hospital, for physician and other healthcare
professional services as approved by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) ..........................................43,697,736
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ...............................................................................................................4,855,304
For payments to the Department of Mental Health for Community
Psychiatric Rehabilitation (CPR) services, Comprehensive
Substance Abuse Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR)
services, Targeted Case Management (TCM) for behavioral
health services, and Certified Community Behavioral Health
Organizations (CCBHO) for MO HealthNet participants and the
uninsured
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) ........................................286,209,702
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 83
(1139) .............................................................................................................31,801,078
For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo., when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) ..........................................15,918,750
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ......................... 1,768,750
Total ....................................................................................................................$4,565,124,074
Section 11.850. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund for the purpose of providing the state
match for Medicaid payments
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) .........................................................................................................$137,074,165
Section 11.855. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to the Department of Mental Health for Community
Psychiatric Rehabilitation (CPR) services, Comprehensive
Substance Abuse Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR)
services, Targeted Case Management (TCM) for behavioral
health services, and Certified Community Behavioral Health
Organizations (CCBHO) for MO HealthNet participants and the
uninsured
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163) ..................................................................$613,086,698
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ....................................................................................................... 312,731,712
Total .......................................................................................................................$925,818,410
Section 11.860. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$38,737,111

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 84
Section 11.865. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ......................................$38,737,111
Section 11.870. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$20,837,332
Section 11.875. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) .......................$20,837,332
Section 11.880. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Federal
Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$718,701,378
Section 11.885. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ........................................$718,701,378
Section 11.890. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$210,950,510
Section 11.895. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ..........................$210,950,510
Section 11.900. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund in accordance with Section
198.418.1, RSMo., to be used by the Department of Health and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 85
Senior Services for conducting inspections and surveys and
providing training and technical assistance to facilities licensed
under the provisions of Chapter 198
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ..............................$1,500,000
Section 11.905. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
PART 2
Section 11.2005. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.080 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of reimbursement rates
greater than $17 per day.
Section 11.2010. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.155 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of contract rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025.
Section 11.2015. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.200 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of Blind Pension rates
greater than $917 per month and $762 per month for
Supplemental Aid to the Blind.
Section 11.2025. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.405, 11.420, 11.425, 11.430, 11.435,
11.440, 11.460, 11.465, 11.475, 11.555, 11.775, 11.765, 11.780
and 11.810 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025.
Section 11.2030. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.420 of Part 1 of this act:

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 86
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of outdoor learning
foster care program provider rates greater than $258 per day.
Section 11.2035. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.430, 11.755, and 11.775 of Part 1 of
this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of Therapeutic Foster
Care provider rates greater than: $173.08 per day for Level 1,
$262.02 per day for Level II.
Section 11.2040. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.435, 11.755, and 11.775 of Part 1 of
this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of QRTP/non-IMD
and QRTP/IMD rates greater than: $194.47 per day for Level II,
$239.16 per day for Level III, $253.80 per day for Level IV.
Section 11.2045. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.435, 11.440, 11.755, and 11.775 of
Part 1 of this act:
Expenses for children placed in a residential treatment facility
shall be covered for placements ordered by the court and not
recommended by an independent assessor.
Section 11.2047. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.435, 11.440, 11.755, 11.775, and
11.780 of Part 1 of this act:
Provided that funding may be expended for the purposes of
transitioning children in the Children’s Division custody from a
current stay or preventing a stay in: 1) an out of state placement,
2) a hospital boarding arrangement, or 3) hotel boarding
arrangement.
Section 11.2050. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.440 and 11.780 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of Psychiatric
Residential Treatment Facility (PRTF) provider rates greater than
$471.46 per day.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 87
Section 11.2055. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.715 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of physician provider
rates greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2024, except
rates for Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics, for
which no funds shall be expended in furtherance of actuarial rates
greater than those approved by the Department of Mental Health,
and further excepting rates for autism services, for which no
funds shall be expended in furtherance of autism rates paid by the
Department of Mental Health on January 1, 2025, and further
excepting independent lab rates, for which no funds shall be
expended in furtherance of 90% of the calendar year 2023
Medicare allowed rate, and further excepting ophthalmologist
rates, for which no funds shall be expended in furtherance of 85%
of the calendar year 2023 Medicare allowed rate, and further
excepting anesthesia rates for dental services, for which no funds
shall be expended greater than 63% of the Medicare conversion
factor for anesthesia services for dental procedures performed in
medical surgical centers.
Section 11.2060. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.725 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of dental provider
rates greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025, except for
dental anesthesia codes, for which no funds shall be expended in
furtherance of 80% of the 50th percentile of the comparable
Usual Customary and Reasonable (UCR) rates on January 1,
2024, and further excepting dentist extraction rates, for which no
funds shall be expended in furtherance of dentist extraction codes
to 38.5% of the 50th percentile of the comparable UCR rates on
January 1, 2024.
Section 11.2065. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.735 and 11.740 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of nursing facility
provider rates greater than the rebased rate, in the aggregate,
determined by the FY2022 nursing facility cost reports, excepting
case mix index adjustments and value based payment
adjustments. No funds shall be expended in furtherance of home

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 88
health provider rates greater than $12.42 per visit of the rate in
effect on January 1, 2024. No funds shall be expended for
Certified Nursing Assistant (CNA) training reimbursement
greater than $1,500 per enrollee.
Section 11.2070. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.755 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of rehabilitation and
specialty provider rates greater than the rate in effect on January
1, 2025, except providers of non-emergency medical
transportation for MO HealthNet and Department of Mental
Health for which no funds shall be expended in furtherance of
provider rates greater than the lower bound actuarial soundness
rate, and further excepting providers of hospice care, for which
no funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than 2.5% for routine home care, continuous care,
inpatient respite care, and general inpatient care greater than the
blended rate in effect on January 1, 2025, and for which no funds
shall be expended in furtherance of rates no greater than 95% of
the nursing facility per diem rate for room and board for services
provided in a nursing facility, and further excepting air
ambulance provider rates for whom no funds shall be expended
in furtherance of provider rates greater than 90% of the Medicare
calendar year 2024 rate from the rate in effect on December 30,
2023.
Section 11.2075. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.770 and 11.775 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of managed care
contract rates greater than the lower bound actuarial soundness
rate.
Section 11.2080. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.780 and 11.820 in Part 1 of this act:
Provided that in-patient Medicaid psychiatric free-standing
hospitals have a minimum rate equivalent to the state fiscal year
2025 weighted average daily rate of $1,194.22.
Section 11.2085. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 89
In reference to Sections 11.780 and 11.820 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended for out-of-state payments.
Section 11.2090. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.780 and 11.820 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of the outpatient
hospital services fee schedule greater than 3% of the rate in effect
January 1, 2025.
Section 11.2095. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.815 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of a $4.69 PMPM to
the Care Coordination PMPM component to advance the
management of social determinants for health home participants.
Section 11.2100. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections except for Section 11.845 in Part 1 of
this act:
No funds shall be expended for program distributions related to
Section 36(c) of Article IV of the Missouri Constitution
PART 3
Section 11.3005. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.420 of Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
Special expenses for clothing allowances shall be paid at least
quarterly.
Section 11.3010. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.615 and 11.625 of Part 1 and Part 2
of this act:
The Department shall provide the House Appropriations and
Senate Appropriations Offices of the General Assembly access to
department-wide data warehouses and analytics platforms not
otherwise available to the General Assembly and necessary to
make data-drive decisions. This section shall not be construed
to compel the release of protected health information or
individually identifiable data.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 90
Section 11.3015. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.770 and 11.775 of Part 1 and Part 2
of this act:
Contract changes shall be provided in writing, prior to
submission to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services,
to the House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee
Chairs.
Section 11.3020. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written notification, prior to
submission to the federal government, of state plans and state
plan amendments, grant applications, and Medicaid waivers to
the House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs.
The Department shall include in the notification the actual
documents submitted to the federal government, as well as the
federal government’s responses when received.
Section 11.3025. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
In reference to the Alternative Care Trust Fund (0905), the
Department shall provide a quarterly accounting of the money to
the parents of the child for whose benefit the funds have been
received by the Department; to the guardian ad litem; and to the
child, if the child is 15 years or older.
Section 11.3030. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written documentation of rate
setting, rate studies, time surveys, time studies, and random
moment time studies, and the federal and state share fiscal impact
estimates, including Title IV-E Foster Care eligibility and
participation rates to the House Budget and Senate Appropriation
Committee Chairs.
Section 11.3035. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written notification and
correspondence from the federal government of non-compliance

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 11 91
with federal programs or grants to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs.
Section 11.3040. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide copies of financial reports and
public assistance cost allocation plans submitted to the federal
government and supporting cash on hand reports, by grant, to the
House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs.
Section 11.3045. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide monthly expenditures and
projections for Child Welfare programs and Medicaid programs
for the current state fiscal year and next state fiscal year to the
House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs on a
monthly basis.
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund (2,529.82 F.T.E.) ...........................................................$2,620,570,469
Federal Funds (3,849.89 F.T.E.) .........................................................................12,637,724,948
Other Funds (365.84 F.T.E.) ............................................................................... 1,772,145,743
Total (6,745.55 F.T.E.) .....................................................................................$17,030,441,160
